Florida, session 2026, HB577.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
47
48 Section 1. Subsections (4) and (5) are added to section
49 627.6474, Florida Statutes, to read:
50 627.6474 Provider contracts.—
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
51 (4)(a) A contract between a health insurer and a
52 contracted health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001
53 must require the health insurer and the contracted health care
54 practitioner to issue a joint written notice to each affected
55 policyholder at least 60 days before the effective date of the
56 cancellation or termination of the contract. The notice must be
57 written in plain language and include all of the following:
58 1. An explanation of the policyholder's rights regarding
59 continuation of care and coverage.
60 2. Applicable timelines for transition of care.
61 3. Contact information for the insurer, the practitioner,
62 and the office for questions or complaints.
63 (b) The commission may adopt rules to administer paragraph
64 (a). The office may impose an administrative fine of up to
65 $5,000 for each violation to a health insurer or contracted
66 health care practitioner that fails to comply with paragraph
67 (a).
68 (5) When a contract between an insurer and a treating
69 health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001 is terminated
70 for any reason, the insurer and the health care practitioner
71 must allow policyholders for whom treatment was active to
72 continue coverage and care, through completion of treatment of a
73 condition for which the policyholder was receiving care at the
74 time of the termination, until the policyholder selects another
75 treating health care practitioner, or during the next open
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
76 enrollment period offered by the insurer, whichever is longer,
77 but not longer than 6 months after termination of the contract.
78 The insurer and the health care practitioner shall allow a
79 policyholder who has initiated a course of prenatal care,
80 regardless of the trimester in which care was initiated, to
81 continue care and coverage until completion of postpartum care.
82 For care continued under this subsection, the insurer and the
83 health care practitioner shall continue to be bound by the terms
84 of the terminated contract. Changes made within 30 days before
85 termination of a contract are effective only if agreed to by
86 both the insurer and the practitioner.
87 Section 2. Section 627.65713, Florida Statutes, is created
88 to read:
89 627.65713 Provider contracts.—
90 (1) A contract between a group, blanket, or franchise
91 health insurer and a contracted health care practitioner as
92 defined in s. 456.001 must require the health insurer and the
93 contracted health care practitioner to issue a joint written
94 notice to each affected policyholder at least 60 days before the
95 effective date of the cancellation or termination of the
96 contract. The notice must be written in plain language and
97 include all of the following:
98 (a) An explanation of the policyholder's rights regarding
99 continuation of care and coverage.
100 (b) Applicable timelines for transition of care.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
101 (c) Contact information for the insurer, the practitioner,
102 and the office for questions or complaints.
103 (2) The commission may adopt rules to administer
104 subsection (1). The office may impose an administrative fine of
105 up to $5,000 for each violation to a health insurer or
106 contracted health care practitioner that fails to comply with
107 subsection (1).
108 (3) When a contract between a group, blanket, or franchise
109 health insurer and a treating health care practitioner as
110 defined in s. 456.001 is terminated for any reason, the insurer
111 and the health care practitioner must allow policyholders for
112 whom treatment was active to continue coverage and care, through
113 completion of treatment of a condition for which the
114 policyholder was receiving care at the time of the termination,
115 until the policyholder selects another treating health care
116 practitioner, or during the next open enrollment period offered
117 by the insurer, whichever is longer, but not longer than 6
118 months after termination of the contract. The insurer and the
119 health care practitioner shall allow a policyholder who has
120 initiated a course of prenatal care, regardless of the trimester
121 in which care was initiated, to continue care and coverage until
122 completion of postpartum care. For care continued under this
123 subsection, the insurer and the health care practitioner shall
124 continue to be bound by the terms of the terminated contract.
125 Changes made within 30 days before termination of a contract are
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
126 effective only if agreed to by both the insurer and the
127 practitioner.
128 Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
129 641.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
130 641.315 Provider contracts.—
131 (2)(a) For all provider contracts executed after October
132 1, 1991, and within 180 days after October 1, 1991, for
133 contracts in existence as of October 1, 1991:
134 1. The contracts must require the provider to give 60
135 days' advance written notice to the health maintenance
136 organization and the office before canceling the contract with
137 the health maintenance organization for any reason.; and
138 2. The contracts contract must also provide that
139 nonpayment for goods or services rendered by the provider to the
140 health maintenance organization is not a valid reason for
141 avoiding the 60-day advance notice of cancellation.
142 3. The contracts must require the health maintenance
143 organization and the provider to issue a joint written notice to
144 each affected subscriber at least 60 days before the effective
145 date of the cancellation or termination of the provider
146 contract. The notice must be written in plain language and
147 include all of the following:
148 a. An explanation of the subscriber's rights regarding
149 continuation of care and coverage.
150 b. Applicable timelines for transition of care.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
151 c. Contact information for the health maintenance
152 organization, the provider, and the Office of Insurance
153 Regulation for questions or complaints.
154 4. The commission may adopt rules to administer
155 subparagraph 3. A health maintenance organization or provider
156 that fails to comply with subparagraph 3. is subject to an
157 administrative fine by the office of up to $5,000 for each
158 violation.
159 Section 4. Subsection (8) of section 641.51, Florida
160 Statutes, is amended to read:
161 641.51 Quality assurance program; second medical opinion
162 requirement.—
163 (8) When a contract between an organization and a treating
164 provider is terminated for any reason other than for cause, each
165 party shall allow subscribers for whom treatment was active to
166 continue coverage and care when medically necessary, through
167 completion of treatment of a condition for which the subscriber
168 was receiving care at the time of the termination, until the
169 subscriber selects another treating provider, or during the next
170 open enrollment period offered by the organization, whichever is
171 longer, but not longer than 6 months after termination of the
172 contract. Each party to the terminated contract shall allow a
173 subscriber who has initiated a course of prenatal care,
174 regardless of the trimester in which care was initiated, to
175 continue care and coverage until completion of postpartum care.
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 577 2026
176 This does not prevent a provider from refusing to continue to
177 provide care to a subscriber who is abusive, noncompliant, or in
178 arrears in payments for services provided. For care continued
179 under this subsection, the organization and the provider shall
180 continue to be bound by the terms of the terminated contract.
181 Changes made within 30 days before termination of a contract are
182 effective only if agreed to by both parties.
183 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb577-00